Utah statutes.
31A-22-1504.   Mandatory coverage.

(1)  A rental company shall provide its renters with primary coverage meeting the requirements of Title 73, Chapter 18c, Financial Responsibility of Motorboat Owners and Operators Act.

(2)  All coverage shall include primary defense costs and may not be waived.

